Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.065

Election for formation—Inclusion of proposition for tax levy or issuance of bonds.

If the petition or resolution initiating the formation of the proposed park and recreation district proposes that the initial capital or operational costs are to be financed by regular property tax levies for a *five-year period as authorized by RCW 36.69.145, or an annual excess levy, or that proposed capital costs are to be financed by the issuance of general obligation bonds and bond retirement levies, a proposition or propositions for such purpose or purposes shall be submitted to the voters of the proposed park and recreation district at the same election. A proposition or propositions for regular property tax levies for a *five-year period as authorized by RCW 36.69.145, an annual excess levy, or the issuance of general obligation bonds and bond retirement levies, may also be submitted to the voters at any general or special election. The ballot proposition or propositions authorizing the imposition of a tax levy or levies, or issuance of general obligation bonds and imposition of tax levies, shall be null and void if the park and recreation district was not authorized to be formed.

[ 1989 c 184 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 1994 c 156 s 3 amended RCW 36.69.145 to authorize a six-year period.